Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.3213, is amended to read: 171.3213 THIRD-PARTY TESTING OF SCHOOL BUS DRIVERSnew text begin ; APPLICANT REQUIREMENTnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A school district that is a third-party testing program and owns or operates school buses may enter into an agreement with other school districts to test the other districts' school bus driver employees. A school bus company that is a third-party testing program and owns or operates school buses may enter into an agreement with other school bus companies to test the other companies' school bus driver employees. A third-party testing program may be reimbursed by the tested driver's school district or company. The agreement must be submitted to the commissioner for approval. A certified third-party tester must be employed by a school district or a school bus company providing the testing services. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any rule or statute to the contrary, a test applicant's test results and test passage administered under a third-party testing program are contingent upon: new text end new text begin (1) remaining employed with the third-party testing program for six months following the test administration date; or new text end new text begin (2) completing the approved school bus driver training program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, for tests administered on or after that date. new text end